Massachusetts, session 194th, H4003.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise in this act or in
4 those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this
5 act or in those appropriation acts, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
6 funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts
7 previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be
8 made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.
9 SECTION 2.
1 of 40

10 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
11 Group Insurance Commission
12 1108-5200 Group Insurance Premium and Plan Costs ...............................................$240,000,000
13 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES
14 1410-0400 Veterans’ Benefits…………………………………………………….......$5,800,000
15 OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
16 1599-3384 Settlements and Judgments ........................................................................$28,917,460
17 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
18 Department of Early Education and Care
19 3000-3060 DCF and DTA Related Child Care .........................................................................$95,554,342
20 3000-4060 Income-Eligible Child Care ......................................................................................$94,015,214
21 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
22 1595-1068 Medical Assistance Trust Fund ................................................................$134,498,420
23 Department of Public Health
24 4513-1012 Women Infants and Children Program Manufacturer Rebates .......................$400,000
25 4590-0912 Western Massachusetts Hospital Retained Revenue ....................................$1,200,000
26 Executive Office of Aging and Independence
27 9110-1630 Home Care Services ...................................................................................$60,000,000
28 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
29 Office of the Secretary of Housing and Livable Communities
30 7004-9316 Residential Assistance for Families in Transition ......................................$42,910,506
31 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
32 State Police
2 of 40

33 8100-0006 Private Detail Retained Revenue ..................................................................$7,750,000
34 8100-1004 State Police Crime Laboratory .....................................................................$4,193,083
35 Military Division
36 8700-0001 Military Division .............................................................................................$593,539
37 SECTION 2A. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
38 provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations, and to meet certain requirements
39 of law, the sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Fund unless
40 specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the several purposes and subject to the
41 conditions specified in this section, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
42 funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be
43 made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
44 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
45 Reserves
46 1599-1776 For a reserve to support celebrations of the United States’ semiquincentennial
47 anniversary; provided, that funds may be made available for statewide initiatives to promote the
48 anniversary and for grants to municipalities for public safety, transportation and logistical costs
49 associated with anniversary celebrations; and provided further, that at the direction of the
50 secretary of administration and finance, funds may be transferred from this item to the
51 Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund established in section 13T of chapter 23A of the General
52 Laws……………………………………………………………………………… $15,000,000
53 EXECUTIVE OFFICE of HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
54 Department of Transitional Assistance
3 of 40

55 4400-1033 For the costs associated with the transition to chipped electronic benefits transfer
56 cards by the department of transitional assistance; provided, that at the direction of the
57 commissioner of transitional assistance, funds may be transferred from this item to item 4400-
58 1000; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item shall be made not revert but shall
59 be made available for these purposes through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027…$15,500,000
60 Department of Public Health
61 4510-0794 For competitive grants to reimburse municipalities for extraordinary emergency
62 medical service costs; provided, that funds in this item shall be administered by the department
63 of public health and shall be reimbursed based on eligibility criteria established by the
64 department………………………………………………………………………… $10,000,000
65 SECTION 3. Section 40 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
66 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof
67 the following subsection:-
68 (d) The boards of trustees for each state-operated veterans’ home may receive donations to
69 benefit the homes. The state treasurer shall receive, deposit, and invest all donations made to the
70 state-operated veterans’ homes. The trustees may expend the donated funds for the direct benefit
71 of the veterans who reside in the state-operated veterans’ homes, acting as fiduciaries with the
72 care, skill and diligence that a prudent person would use.
73 SECTION 4. Chapter 6D of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out section
74 6, as most recently amended by section 14 of chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in
75 place thereof the following section:-
4 of 40

76 Section 6. (a) Each acute hospital, ambulatory surgical center, pharmaceutical manufacturing
77 company and pharmacy benefit manager shall pay to the commonwealth an amount for the
78 estimated expenses of the commission.
79 (b) The assessed amount for acute hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers shall be not less
80 than 30 per cent nor more than 40 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for
81 the expenses of the commission minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and
82 charges generated by the commission; and (iii) federal matching revenues received for these
83 expenses or received retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies. Each acute hospital and
84 ambulatory surgical center shall pay such assessed amount multiplied by the ratio of the acute
85 hospital’s and ambulatory surgical center's gross patient service revenues to the total gross
86 patient service revenues of all such hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers. Each acute
87 hospital and ambulatory surgical center shall make a preliminary payment to the commission on
88 October 1 of each year in an amount equal to 1/2 of the previous year’s total assessment.
89 Thereafter, each acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center shall pay, within 30 days’ notice
90 from the commission, the balance of the total assessment for the current year based upon its most
91 current projected gross patient service revenue. The commission shall subsequently adjust the
92 assessment for any variation in actual and estimated expenses of the commission and for changes
93 in acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center gross patient service revenue. Such estimated
94 and actual expenses shall include an amount equal to the cost of fringe benefits and indirect
95 expenses, as established by the comptroller under section 5D of chapter 29. In the event of late
96 payment by any such acute hospital or ambulatory surgical center, the treasurer shall advance the
97 amount of due and unpaid funds to the commission prior to the receipt of such monies in
98 anticipation of such revenues up to the amount authorized in the then current budget attributable
5 of 40

99 to such assessments and the commission shall reimburse the treasurer for such advances upon
100 receipt of such revenues. This section shall not apply to any state institution or to any acute
101 hospital which is operated by a city or town.
102 (c) To the maximum extent permissible under federal law, and provided that such assessment
103 will not result in any reduction of federal financial participation in Medicaid, the assessed
104 amount for pharmaceutical manufacturing companies shall be not less than 5 per cent nor more
105 than 10 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the
106 commission minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the
107 commission; and (iii) federal matching revenues received for these expenses or received
108 retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies. Each pharmaceutical manufacturing company
109 shall pay such assessed amount multiplied by the ratio of the manufacturer’s total outpatient
110 prescription drug revenue derived from the sales within the Commonwealth to the total
111 outpatient prescription drug revenue of all manufacturers derived from sales within the
112 Commonwealth.
113 (d) To the maximum extent permissible under federal law, and provided that such assessment
114 will not result in any reduction of federal financial participation in Medicaid, the assessed
115 amount for pharmacy benefit managers shall be not less than 5 per cent nor more than 10 per
116 cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the commission minus
117 amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the commission; and
118 (iii) federal matching revenues received for these expenses or received retroactively for expenses
119 of predecessor agencies. Each pharmacy benefit manager shall pay such assessed amount
120 multiplied by the ratio of the claims paid by the pharmacy benefit manager attributed to residents
121 of the commonwealth for whom it manages pharmaceutical benefits on behalf of carriers to the
6 of 40

122 total of all such claims paid by all pharmacy benefit managers attributed to residents of the
123 commonwealth for whom they manage pharmaceutical benefits on behalf of carriers.
124 (e) Each pharmaceutical manufacturing company and each pharmacy benefit manager shall make
125 a preliminary payment to the commission annually on October 1 in an amount equal to 1/2 of the
126 previous year's total assessment. Thereafter, each pharmaceutical manufacturing company and
127 each pharmacy benefit manager shall pay, within 30 days of receiving notice from the
128 commission, the balance of the total assessment for the current year as determined by the
129 commission.
130 SECTION 5. Section 61 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
131 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 132, the words “March 15” and
132 inserting in place thereof the following words:- June 1.
133 SECTION 6. Section 11M of chapter 12 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
134 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 52 to 54, inclusive, the following
135 words:- ; provided, however, that the commission shall not approve such a request if the request
136 would exceed an annual reimbursement of ……………………………………………$3,000,000.
137 SECTION 7. Chapter 12C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
138 Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 7, as most recently amended by section 38 of
139 chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
140 Section 7. (a) Each acute hospital, ambulatory surgical center, pharmaceutical manufacturing
141 company and pharmacy benefit manager, shall pay to the commonwealth an amount for the
142 estimated expenses of the center and for the other purposes described in this chapter which shall
7 of 40

143 include any transfer made to the Community Hospital Reinvestment Trust Fund established in
144 section 2TTTT of chapter 29.
145 (b) The assessed amount for acute hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers shall be not less
146 than 30 per cent nor more than 40 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for
147 the expenses of the center and for the other purposes described in this chapter which shall
148 include any transfer made to the Community Hospital Reinvestment Trust Fund established in
149 section 2TTTT of chapter 29 minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges
150 generated by the center’s publication or dissemination of reports and information; and (iii)
151 federal matching revenues received for these expenses or received retroactively for expenses of
152 predecessor agencies. Each acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center shall pay such assessed
153 amount multiplied by the ratio of the acute hospital’s or ambulatory surgical center's gross
154 patient service revenues to the total gross patient services revenues of all such hospitals and
155 ambulatory surgical centers. Each acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center shall make a
156 preliminary payment to the center on October 1 of each year in an amount equal to 1/2 of the
157 previous year’s total assessment. Thereafter, each acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center
158 shall pay, within 30 days’ notice from the center, the balance of the total assessment for the
159 current year based upon its most current projected gross patient service revenue. The center shall
160 subsequently adjust the assessment for any variation in actual and estimated expenses of the
161 center and for changes in acute hospital and ambulatory surgical center gross patient service
162 revenue. Such estimated and actual expenses shall include an amount equal to the cost of fringe
163 benefits and indirect expenses, as established by the comptroller under section 5D of chapter 29.
164 In the event of late payment by any such acute hospital or ambulatory surgical center, the
165 treasurer shall advance the amount of due and unpaid funds to the center prior to the receipt of
8 of 40

166 such monies in anticipation of such revenues up to the amount authorized in the then current
167 budget attributable to such assessments and the center shall reimburse the treasurer for such
168 advances upon receipt of such revenues. This section shall not apply to any state institution or to
169 any acute hospital which is operated by a city or town.
170 (c) To the maximum extent permissible under federal law, and provided that such assessment
171 will not result in any reduction of federal financial participation in Medicaid, the assessed
172 amount for pharmaceutical manufacturing companies shall be not less than 5 per cent nor more
173 than 10 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the center
174 minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the center’s
175 publication or dissemination of reports and information; and (iii) federal matching revenues
176 received for these expenses or received retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies. Each
177 pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall pay such assessed amount multiplied by the ratio
178 of the manufacturer’s total outpatient prescription drug revenue derived from the sales within the
179 Commonwealth to the total outpatient prescription drug revenue of all manufacturers derived
180 from sales within the Commonwealth.
181 (d) To the maximum extent permissible under federal law, and provided that such assessment
182 will not result in any reduction of federal financial participation in Medicaid, the assessed
183 amount for pharmacy benefit managers shall be not less than 5 per cent nor more than 10 per
184 cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the center minus
185 amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the center’s publication
186 or dissemination of reports and information; and (iii) federal matching revenues received for
187 these expenses or received retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies. Each pharmacy
188 benefit manager shall pay such assessed amount multiplied by the ratio of the claims paid by the
9 of 40

189 pharmacy benefit manager attributed to residents of the commonwealth for whom it manages
190 pharmaceutical benefits on behalf of carriers to the total of all such claims paid by all pharmacy
191 benefit managers attributed to residents of the commonwealth for whom they manage
192 pharmaceutical benefits on behalf of carriers.
193 (e) Each pharmaceutical manufacturing company and each pharmacy benefit manager shall make
194 a preliminary payment to the center annually on October 1 in an amount equal to 1/2 of the
195 previous year’s total assessment. Thereafter, each pharmaceutical manufacturing company and
196 each pharmacy benefit manager shall pay, within 30 days’ notice from the center, the balance of
197 the total assessment for the current year as determined by the center.
198 SECTION 8. Section 16 of chapter 23D of the General Laws, as most recently amended
199 by section 48 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, in the first
200 sentence, the words “Growth Capital Corporation” and inserting in place thereof the following
201 words:- Development Finance Agency
202 SECTION 9. Section 1 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
203 section 51 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of
204 “Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation”, and inserting in place thereof the following
205 definition:-
206 “Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation”, the Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation
207 established in section 105 of chapter 240 of the acts of 2010, the power, functions, assets and
208 liabilities of which have been merged into the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency.
10 of 40

209 SECTION 10. Subsection (l) of section 2 of said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as
210 most recently amended by section 55 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
211 striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:-
212 The agency shall be the successor to the Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation, previously
213 established in section 105 of chapter 240 of the acts of 2010.
214 SECTION 11. Said section 2 of said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as most recently
215 amended by section 55 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking
216 out subsection (m).
217 SECTION 12. Subsection (a) of section 3 of said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as
218 most recently amended by section 56 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
219 striking out paragraph (36), and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
220 (36) to borrow money by the issuance of debt obligations whether tax exempt or taxable and
221 secure such obligations by the pledge of its revenues or the revenues, mortgages and notes of
222 others;
223 SECTION 13. Said section 3 of said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as most recently
224 amended by sections 56 and 57 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by
225 striking out the words “to administer trusts,”.
226 SECTION 14. Subsection (d) of section 8 of said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as
227 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “directors,”
228 in line 134, the following words:- or a duly authorized committee of the board.
11 of 40

229 SECTION 15. Subsection (n) of section 29A of said chapter 23G, as so appearing, is
230 hereby amended by striking out, in line 221, the words “convene on a monthly basis in order to”.
231 SECTION 16. Subsection (b) of section 48 of said chapter 23G, as most recently
232 amended by section 58 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, the
233 first time it appears, the word “corporation” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
234 agency.
235 SECTION 17. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
236 section 2JJJJJJ the following section:
237 Section 2KKKKKK. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
238 separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Office of the Inspector General
239 Recovery Fund, which shall be administered by the office of the inspector general. The fund
240 shall be credited with any monies payable to the inspector general from civil recoveries,
241 settlement funds, or recoupment of administrative and investigatory costs and may earn and be
242 credited interest.
243 Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the office of
244 the inspector general’s operational, administrative and investigatory purposes.
245 The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for
246 expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund
247 to be in deficit at any point.
248 SECTION 18. Section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
249 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21, 54, 57 and 66, the figure
12 of 40

250 “$50,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
251 figure:- $75,000.
252 SECTION 19. Said section 39M of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further
253 amended by striking out, in line 67, the figure “$150,000” and inserting in place thereof the
254 following figure:- $250,000.
255 SECTION 20. Said section 39R of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further
256 amended by striking out, in line 10, the words “one hundred thousand dollars” and inserting in
257 place thereof the following figure:- $250,000.
258 SECTION 21. Section 33 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
259 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end of the third paragraph the following
260 clause:- ; provided, however, that the length of service of a person appointed through an original
261 appointment to a civil service position of municipal police officer or fire officer from a local
262 public safety register pursuant to Section 59A of this chapter shall be calculated from and, in all
263 instances remain, the date of such original appointment from the register and shall not be subject
264 to adjustment at any time for prior employment by the commonwealth or another city or town.
265 SECTION 22. Section 59 of said chapter 31, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
266 striking out, in the last sentence of the second paragraph, the words “three years after
267 certification” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 3 years after appointment and
268 performance of the job duties.
269 SECTION 23. Subsection (a) of section 59A of said chapter 31, as appearing in section
270 147 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended in the first paragraph by inserting after
271 the words “municipal police” the following words:- , MBTA police,.
13 of 40

272 SECTION 24. Section 59A of said chapter 31, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
273 adding the following subsection:-
274 (g) Notwithstanding any prior appointments, any person who receives an appointment pursuant
275 to this section shall have their local public safety register appointment date as their seniority date
276 for all purposes under this chapter.
277 SECTION 25. Section 75 of said chapter 31, as amended by chapter 238 of the acts of
278 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:-
279 Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit civil service employees to
280 furnish information to, or cooperate with, law enforcement authorities in contravention of section
281 11I½ of chapter 12.
282 SECTION 26. Section 1A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as inserted by section 36
283 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the definition for “Public
284 service corporation” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
285 “Public service corporation”, (i) a corporation or other entity duly qualified to conduct business
286 in the commonwealth that owns or operates or proposes to own or operate assets or facilities to
287 provide electricity, gas, telecommunications, cable, water or other similar services of public need
288 or convenience to the public directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to, an entity that
289 owns or operates or proposes to own or operate electricity generation, storage, transmission or
290 distribution facilities, or natural gas facilities including pipelines, manufacturing, and storage
291 facilities; (ii) any transportation company that owns or operates or proposes to own or operate
292 railways and related common carrier facilities; (iii) any communications company, including a
293 wireless communications company or cable company that owns or operates or proposes to own
14 of 40

294 or operate communications or cable facilities; and (iv) any water company that owns or operates
295 or proposes to own or operate facilities necessary for its operations.
296 SECTION 27. Section 64A of chapter 60 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 93
297 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting
298 in place thereof the following subsection:-
299 (a) This section shall apply to the sale or retention of property by a municipality or a purchaser of
300 tax receivables following a final judgment of the land court foreclosing the right of redemption
301 under this chapter. Not more than 180 days after the entry of judgment foreclosing the right of
302 redemption becomes final, with either no appeal having been taken within the applicable time
303 limit or any appeal taken having resulted in the entry of judgment pursuant to the rescript of the
304 supreme judicial court or appeals court, the judgment holder shall proceed to sell the property in
305 the manner provided in this section and section 77B, unless, in cases where the judgment holder
306 is a municipality, the chief executive authority thereof makes a written determination, within 120
307 days of the date of final judgment foreclosing the right of redemption, that the property will be
308 retained for municipal use. The judgment holder shall notify the former owners of the property
309 and all others known to hold the right of redemption in the property at the time judgment is
310 entered, by certified mail, to their last known address or place of business, of: (i) the judgment
311 holder’s election; and (ii) the rights and procedures for claiming excess equity set forth in this
312 section.
313 SECTION 28. Said section 64A of said chapter 60, as inserted by said section 93 of said
314 chapter 140, is hereby further amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place
315 thereof the following subsection:-
15 of 40

316 (c)(1) A municipality or a purchaser of tax receivables that has elected to sell the property under
317 subsection (a) shall, not later than 180 days after the final judgment of the land court, list the
318 property for sale with a real estate agent or broker licensed in the commonwealth or auction the
319 property with an auctioneer licensed in the commonwealth; provided, however, that the judgment
320 holder and any parties entitled to claim excess equity under this section may agree to a later date
321 for sale or auction; provided further, that the real estate agent, broker or auctioneer shall not hold
322 elected or appointed office or be employed by the municipality in which the property is located;
323 provided further, that a judgment holder who elects to auction the property shall accept bids that
324 are not less than 2/3 of the appraised value of the property consistent with the appraisal
325 requirements of subsection (b); and provided further, that a judgment holder who elects to
326 auction the property shall not accept bids by individuals that hold elected or appointed office or
327 are employed by the municipality in which the property is located.
328 (2) The judgment holder for a property listed for sale pursuant to paragraph (1) that does not sell
329 within 12 months of the date of listing shall: (i) auction the property with an auctioneer licensed
330 in the commonwealth; provided, however, that the auctioneer does not hold elected or appointed
331 office or is not employed by the municipality in which the property is located; (ii) accept bids
332 that are not less than 2/3 of the appraised value of the property consistent with the appraisal
333 requirements of subsection (b); and (iii) not accept bids by individuals that hold elected or
334 appointed office or are employed by the municipality in which the property is located.
335 (3) A property shall not be considered retained by a judgment holder that has elected under
336 subsection (a) to sell or auction the property and has complied with the requirements of
337 paragraph (1) but has been without success in such sale or auction. If a property has not been
338 sold after an auction, the judgment holder shall notify any parties entitled to claim excess equity
16 of 40

339 of their intention to continue the sale to another date and not to retain the property. Such notice
340 shall be mailed, by certified mail, to any parties entitled to claim excess equity, or their
341 successors in interest, to their last known address or place of business.
342 SECTION 29. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
343 chapter 178 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words “pleasure passenger
344 vehicles owned by veterans who, according to the records of the United States Veterans’
345 Administration, has been determined to have a service-connected disability rating of 60 per cent
346 or greater and by reason of service in the armed forces of the United States have suffered loss or
347 permanent loss of use of one or both feet; or loss or permanent loss of use of one or both hands;
348 or permanent impairment of vision of both eyes of the following status: central visual acuity of
349 20/200 or less in the better eye, with corrective glasses, or central visual acuity of more than
350 20/200 if there is a field defect in which the peripheral field has contracted to such an extent that
351 the widest diameter of visual field subtends an angular distance no greater than twenty degrees in
352 the better eye, or any other disability or handicap of such veterans which may be determined by
353 the medical advisory board as established by section eight C, and”.
354 SECTION 30. The seventh paragraph of said section 2 of said chapter 90, as so
355 appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the third and fourth sentences.
356 SECTION 31. Said section 2 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
357 amended by striking out the words “and the words “Disabled Veteran” for a pleasure passenger
358 vehicle or a pick-up truck owned or leased by and used by a veteran who, according to the
359 records of the United States Veterans’ Administration, by reason of service in the armed forces
360 of the United States has suffered loss or permanent loss of use of one or both feet; or loss or
17 of 40

361 permanent loss of use of one or both hands; or permanent impairment of vision of both eyes of
362 the following status: central visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye, with corrective
363 glasses, or central visual acuity of more than 20/200 if there is a field defect in which the
364 peripheral field has contracted to such an extent that the widest diameter of visual field subtends
365 an angular distance no greater that 20 degrees in the better eye, or any other disability or
366 handicap”.
367 SECTION 32. Said section 2 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
368 amended by striking out the twelfth paragraph.
369 SECTION 33. Said section 2 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
370 amended by striking out the fifteenth through seventeenth paragraphs, inclusive.
371 SECTION 34. Said section 2 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
372 amended by striking out the nineteenth through twenty-second paragraphs, inclusive.
373 SECTION 35. Said chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further
374 amended by inserting after section 2I the following section:-
375 Section 2J. (a) The registrar shall design and maintain a series of distinct and individual license
376 plates recognizing those who have served in the military and for those who deserve special
377 recognition relating to or deriving from military service.
378 (b) Any veteran meeting the definition of a veteran in clause forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4
379 or section 1 of chapter 115, or who is eligible for the annuity provided under section 6C of
380 chapter 115, shall be eligible and entitled to a veteran plate which shall carry the denotation
18 of 40

381 “VETERAN”, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence of such status as determined by the
382 registrar.
383 (c) The series of distinct and individual license plates recognizing those who have served in the
384 military and for those who deserve special recognition relating to or deriving from military
385 service shall include the license plates described in the following paragraphs:
386 (1) Veterans ranked as at least 60 per cent disabled by the United States Department of Veterans
387 Affairs, including those who have suffered the loss of a limb, permanent visual acuity loss of
388 20/200 in an eye, or are otherwise determined to be disabled or handicapped by the medical
389 advisory board established in section 8C, shall be entitled to a distinctive disabled veteran plate.
390 (2) Veterans who have been captured and incarcerated by foreign forces in conflict or held as
391 prisoners of war shall be entitled to a distinctive plate recognizing that status.
392 (3) Veterans who are members of the Legion of Valor of the United States of America,
393 Incorporated shall be entitled to a distinctive plate recognizing that status.
394 (4) Veterans awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor shall be entitled to a distinctive plate
395 recognizing that status, including, subject to availability, the use of the initials of the award
396 recipient followed by CMH signifying their award.
397 (5) Veterans awarded the Order of the Purple Heart shall be entitled to a distinctive plate
398 indicating that status which shall include the words “COMBAT WOUNDED.”
399 (6) Survivors of the attack upon Pearl Harbor shall be entitled to a distinctive plate reflecting that
400 status and bearing the word “VETERAN” thereupon.
19 of 40

401 (7) Residents of the commonwealth serving in any branch of the national guard shall be entitled
402 to a distinctive plate reflecting that status.
403 (8) Residents of the commonwealth awarded the Medal of Liberty under section 67A of chapter
404 33 shall be entitled to a distinctive plate reflecting that status.
405 (9) The next of kin of a member of the armed forces, in possession of a Gold Star Lapel Button
406 under the regulations of the United States Secretary of Defense, shall be entitled to a Gold Star
407 Family distinctive plate. Said button shall not be an eligibility requirement for those who have
408 presented other satisfactory evidence of their status, as determined by the registrar.
409 (d) A veteran who has served in the armed forces and is entitled to a veteran license plate shall
410 also be entitled to the issuance of a decal or emblem denoting their branch of service. Residents
411 of the commonwealth identifying as a woman veteran who served in any branch shall be entitled
412 to a distinctive decal which the registry of motor vehicles shall design and issue.
413 (e) The following individuals shall be entitled to a distinctive plate, emblem or decal denoting
414 their award status:
415 (1) Owners of private vehicles awarded 1 of the following decorations for valor or gallantry: the
416 Silver Star, the Bronze Star, the Distinguished Flying Cross, the Distinguish Service Cross, the
417 Navy Cross, the Air Force Cross, or any other similar award designated by the secretary of
418 veterans’ services.
419 (2) A resident of the commonwealth qualifying as a Gold Star parent, child, sibling, grandchild
420 or spouse. A distinctive plate, under this paragraph, may not be used in conjunction with a motor
421 vehicle that has promotional or advertising material thereupon.
20 of 40

422 (f) Veterans entitled to a distinctive plate shall be entitled to have a distinctive emblem or decal
423 reflecting service in Operation Enduring Freedom or the receipt of the Iraqi Freedom Campaign
424 Ribbon, an Afghanistan Campaign Ribbon, a Persian Gulf Campaign Ribbon, the Armed Forces
425 Expeditionary Medal, the Southwest Asia Service Medal, the Inherent Resolve Campaign Medal,
426 the Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal, the Vietnam Service Medal, the Kosovo
427 Campaign Medal, or the Prisoner of War Medal.
428 (g) Under any special recognition or status recognized in this section, a widowed person shall not
429 be compelled to surrender their distinctive plate, emblem or decal unless they remarry, cancel or
430 fail to renew registration. If the deceased person was entitled to recognition under any portion of
431 this section but did not apply for special status under this section, a widowed person may
432 nonetheless apply in the stead of their deceased spouse.
433 (h) Any special status under this section shall entitle the bearer to only 1 special plate, emblem or
434 decal; provided, however, that such person may, at their option, have the distinctive plate,
435 emblem or decal issued in a form suitable for use on a motorcycle rather than a passenger car.
436 (i) Any plate to which an individual is entitled under this section shall be issued without fee other
437 than the established registration fee for private passenger motor vehicles and motorcycles. The
438 registrar may provide individuals the option of paying an additional fee. Any funds related to the
439 additional fee generated under this section shall be distributed to the state operated veterans’
440 homes on an equal basis, to their special account, up to $500,000 for each home. Any excess fee
441 over $500,000 for each state-operated veterans’ home shall be placed in the special trust fund
442 subject to the control of the secretary of veterans’ services.
21 of 40

443 SECTION 36. Section 7I of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
444 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 8, after the word “vehicles” the
445 following words:- and vehicles operated by the Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
446 SECTION 37. Section 1 of chapter 90F, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
447 hereby amended by striking out, in line 65, the words “(49 App. USC 1801) et seq” and inserting
448 in place thereof the following words:- (49 USC 5101 et seq.)
449 SECTION 38. Paragraph (C) of section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby
450 amended by striking out, in line 17, the words “of from $2,750 to $11,000 inclusive” and
451 inserting in place thereof the following words:- as required under subsection (b)(2) of Appendix
452 B of 49 C.F.R. 386.
453 SECTION 39. Paragraph (D) of said section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is
454 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words “of not more than $10,000” and
455 inserting in place thereof the following words:- as required under subsection (b)(3) of Appendix
456 B of 49 C.F.R. 386.
457 SECTION 40. Subparagraph (3) of paragraph (E1/2) of said section 9 of said chapter
458 90F, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 67, the words “$1,100 and not
459 more than $2,750” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- as required under
460 subsection (b)(1) of Appendix B of 49 C.F.R. 386.
461 SECTION 41. Said section 9 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby further
462 amended by striking out paragraph (D) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
22 of 40

463 (D) Any person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life for (i)
464 using a commercial motor vehicle or a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving
465 the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to
466 manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance; or (ii) using a commercial motor
467 vehicle in the commission of any felony involving trafficking in persons or organs as prohibited
468 by sections 50, 51 or 53 of chapter 265 or any felony involving an act or practice of severe forms
469 of trafficking in persons, as defined in 22 U.S.C. 7102(11).
470 SECTION 42. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
471 following section:-
472 Section 245. (a) For the purposes of this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,
473 the definitions set forth under section 1 of chapter 94C shall apply.
474 (b) At the commissioner’s discretion, a pharmacy operated by the department may distribute
475 controlled substances to health care providers and entities legally authorized to administer,
476 possess, distribute, deliver, or dispense controlled substances, provided such controlled
477 substances are (i) related to the provision of reproductive health care services, as defined in
478 section 11I 1/2 of chapter 12; or (ii) to ensure access to controlled substances needed to provide
479 treatment in the event of a public health emergency declared pursuant to section 2A of chapter
480 17.
481 (c) The department may exercise the authority granted in this section for the benefit of any
482 person, whether or not the person is under the custody, care, or supervision of an agency of the
483 commonwealth.
23 of 40

484 (d) The department shall exercise the authority granted in this section in accordance with
485 applicable laws including, but not limited to, applicable controlled substances registration
486 requirements; provided, however, that the department shall be exempt from obtaining a
487 pharmacy license in accordance with section 39 of chapter 112.
488 SECTION 43. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
489 section 6 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
490 Section 6. There shall be a MassHealth program advisory committee to advise the executive
491 office on matters of concern related to policy development and matters related to effective
492 program administration. The assistant secretary for MassHealth or their designee shall select
493 members for the advisory committee on a rotating and continuous basis in such numbers and for
494 such terms as the executive office deems appropriate.
495 (a) The MassHealth program advisory committee shall include representation of at least 1
496 member from each of the following categories: (i) members of the MassHealth member advisory
497 committee; (ii) state or local consumer group or other community-based organization that
498 represents the interests of, or provides direct service to, MassHealth beneficiaries; (iii) clinical
499 provider or administrator who is familiar with the health and social needs of MassHealth
500 beneficiaries and with the resources available and required for their care. This includes providers
501 or administrators of primary care, specialty care, and long-term care; (iv) as applicable, Medicaid
502 participating managed care entities, including but not limited to managed care organizations,
503 accountable care partnership plans, primary care accountable care organizations, one care plans,
504 senior care options plans, the behavioral health vendor, or the primary care clinician plan; and
24 of 40

505 (v) another state agency that serves MassHealth beneficiaries, to serve as ex-officio, non-voting
506 members.
507 (b) The executive office shall provide the committee with such staff and technical assistance as is
508 necessary to enable the committee to make effective recommendations, and such financial
509 arrangements as are necessary to make possible the participation of recipient members.
510 (c) The office of Medicaid shall make a report to the committee on health care financing and to
511 house and senate committees on ways and means no later than October 1 of each year on the
512 previous state fiscal year's activities of the MassHealth program advisory committee. The report
513 shall include, but not be limited to, the names and titles of committee members, dates of
514 committee meetings, agendas and minutes or notes from such meetings, and any correspondence,
515 memorandum, recommendations or other product of the committee's work. MassHealth member
516 advisory committee members will have the option to omit their names from the report.
517 SECTION 44. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
518 section 9F and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
519 Section 9F. (a) The secretary of health and human services may establish, subject to
520 appropriation, all required federal approvals and agreements and the availability of federal
521 financial participation, a health care program for dual eligible individuals, aged 21 to 64 at the
522 time of enrollment, who are dually eligible for benefits under MassHealth Standard or
523 CommonHealth and Medicare under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act and do not have any
524 additional comprehensive health coverage. Under the program, the executive office may contract
525 to provide integrated, comprehensive Medicaid and Medicare services, including medical,
526 behavioral health and long-term support services for a capitated payment.
25 of 40

527 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of health and human
528 services may review a request for financial solvency certification by a care delivery organization
529 based in the commonwealth applying to serve as a Medicare plan caring for residents who are
530 dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid. Upon determination that appropriate financial
531 standards, which may be the standards already in place for organizations with contracts pursuant
532 to this section, have been met, the secretary shall so certify to the centers for Medicare and
533 Medicaid services. Said secretary may require the requesting organization to pay a reasonable
534 certification fee.
535 (c) As used in this subsection, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
536 otherwise, have the following meanings:
537 “Dual eligible”, or “dually eligible person”, any person age 21 or older and under age 65 at the
538 time of enrollment in a dual eligible managed care organization who is enrolled in both Medicare
539 and MassHealth.
540 “Dual eligible managed care organization”, a comprehensive network of medical, health care and
541 long-term services and supports providers that integrates all components of care, either directly
542 or through subcontracts and has been contracted with by the executive office to provide services
543 to dually eligible individuals under this section.
544 Members of the MassHealth managed care program integrating care for dual eligible persons
545 shall be provided an independent community care coordinator by the dual eligible managed care
546 organization, who shall be a participant in the member's care team. The community care
547 coordinator shall assist in the development of a long-term support and services care plan. The
548 community care coordinator shall:
26 of 40

549 (i) participate in initial and ongoing assessments of the health and functional status of the
550 member, including determining appropriateness for long-term care support and services, either in
551 the form of institutional or community-based care plans and related service packages necessary
552 to improve or maintain enrollee health and functional status;
553 (ii) arrange and, with the agreement of the member and the care team, coordinate appropriate
554 institutional and community long-term supports and services, including assistance with the
555 activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living, housing, home-delivered
556 meals, transportation and, under specific conditions or circumstances established by the dual
557 eligible managed care organization, authorize a range and amount of community-based services;
558 and
559 (iii) monitor the appropriate provision and functional outcomes of community long-term care
560 services, according to the service plan as deemed appropriate by the member and the care team;
561 and track member satisfaction and the appropriate provision and functional outcomes of
562 community long-term care services, according to the service plan as deemed appropriate by the
563 member and the care team.
564 (d) The dual eligible managed care organization shall not have a direct or indirect financial
565 ownership interest in an entity that serves as an independent care coordinator. Providers of
566 institutional or community based long-term services and supports on a compensated basis shall
567 not function as an independent care coordinator; provided, however, that the secretary may grant
568 a waiver of this restriction upon a finding that public necessity and convenience require such a
569 waiver. For the purposes of this section, an organization compensated to provide only evaluation,
27 of 40

570 assessment, coordination, skills training, peer supports and fiscal intermediary services shall not
571 be considered a provider of long term services and supports.
572 SECTION 45. Section 10H1/2 of said chapter 118E of the General Laws, as inserted by
573 chapter 388 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence and inserting
574 in place thereof the following sentence:- The division and its contracted health insurers, health
575 plans, health maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party
576 administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician
577 plan shall provide coverage for the treatment of Down syndrome through medically necessary
578 speech therapy, occupational therapy, physical therapy and, for individuals under the age of 21,
579 applied behavior analysis services.
580 SECTION 46. Section 64 of said chapter 118E, as most recently amended by section 29
581 of chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, from the definition of
582 “Center for health information and analysis revenue amount”, the words “, ambulatory surgical
583 centers and non-hospital provider organizations” and inserting in place thereof the following
584 words:- and ambulatory surgical centers.
585 SECTION 47. Said section 64 of said chapter 118E, as most recently amended by section
586 30 of said chapter 342, is hereby amended by striking out, from the definition of “Health policy
587 commission revenue amount”, the words “, ambulatory surgical centers and non-hospital
588 provider organizations” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and ambulatory
589 surgical centers.
590 SECTION 48. Said chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
591 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
28 of 40

592 Section 83. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive office of
593 health and human services may directly pay other state agencies, including county correctional
594 facilities and department of corrections facilities operated by such state agencies, for any claims
595 related to Medicaid, under the provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act; the children’s
596 health insurance program, under the provisions of Title XXI of the Social Security Act; health
597 safety net, under the provisions of sections 64 through 69 of chapter 118E; children’s medical
598 security plan, under the provisions of section 10F of chapter 118E; and other similar healthcare
599 programs provided that such state agencies meet all applicable conditions of participation in
600 these programs, as determined by the executive office of health and human services in its sole
601 discretion.
602 SECTION 49. Section 29 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
603 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the figure “$25,000” and inserting
604 in place thereof the following figure:- $50,000.
605 SECTION 50. Section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
606 striking out, in lines 61, 80, 84 and 100, the figure “$50,000”, each time it appears, and inserting
607 in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $75,000.
608 SECTION 51. Said section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further
609 amended by striking out, in lines 101 and 112, the figure “$150,000”, each time it appears, and
610 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $250,000.
611 SECTION 52. Section 44F of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
612 striking out, in lines 6 and 42, the figure “$25,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place
613 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $50,000.
29 of 40

614 SECTION 53. Subsection (d) of section 81 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022, as
615 amended by chapter 239 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words
616 “environmental justice communities” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
617 environmental justice populations.
618 SECTION 54. Said subsection (d) of said section 81 of said chapter 179 is hereby
619 amended by striking out paragraphs (5) and (6) and inserting in place thereof the following 2
620 paragraphs:-
621 (5) Not later than 12 months after the completion of each assessment, each electric distribution
622 company may submit to the department of public utilities its plan and an application to revise its
623 rates to account for the additional distribution infrastructure included in the plan pursuant to
624 paragraph (4). The application shall include: (i) testimony that explains how the application is
625 consistent with the plan pursuant to paragraph (4); (ii) an explanation of the need for each
626 distribution infrastructure investment; (iii) supporting documentation demonstrating that the
627 actual or estimated costs for each distribution infrastructure investment are reasonable; and (iv)
628 the actual or estimated in-service date of the distribution infrastructure investment. Such
629 application shall be preliminarily approved by the department of public utilities not later than 6
630 months after submission so long as the requested rate revision is consistent with the department's
631 practices and incremental costs are not otherwise accounted for in the electric distribution
632 company's existing rates. The department's review of such application shall not be construed as a
633 prudence review. The electric distribution company's application shall be deemed approved if the
634 department does not act within 6 months.
30 of 40

635 (6) The department of public utilities shall review the additional distribution infrastructure
636 investments planned pursuant to paragraph (4) during the next general rate case of the electric
637 distribution company. Each electric distribution company shall be entitled to cost recovery of
638 such infrastructure investments where the electric distribution company demonstrates: (i) how it
639 evaluated advanced transmission technologies, energy storage, other infrastructure investments
640 and alternatives other than infrastructure investments to satisfy projected demand; (ii) that the
641 proposed infrastructure investments were cost effective compared with the alternatives, provide
642 net benefits for customers and meet the criteria enumerated in clauses (i) to (vi), inclusive, of
643 subsection (a) of said section 92B of said chapter 164; and (iii) that the expenses are incremental
644 to the costs already recovered through base distribution rates or recovered through reconciling
645 mechanisms. The department may as necessary, require customers to be credited for any change
646 in rates made pursuant to paragraph (5) with interest.
647 SECTION 55. Section 82 of said chapter 179, as amended by chapter 239 of the acts of
648 2024, is hereby amended, in line 1801, by striking the figure “2025” and inserting place thereof:-
649 “2027”
650 SECTION 56. Item 0910-0210 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
651 amended by adding the following clause:- ; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
652 special law to the contrary, funds may be collected in the prior fiscal year for service programs or
653 activities delivered during the next fiscal year; and provided further, that any unspent balance at
654 the close of the current fiscal year up to the ceiling shall remain in the account and may be
655 expended for the item in the following fiscal year.
31 of 40

656 SECTION 57. Item 4513-1012 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
657 amended by striking out the figure “$27,400,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place
658 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $27,800,000.
659 SECTION 58. Item 4590-0912 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
660 by striking out the figure “$27,995,640”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
661 each instance, the following figure:- $29,195,640.
662 SECTION 59. Item 8100-0006 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
663 by striking out the figure “$37,250,000”, both times it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
664 each instance, the following figure:- $45,000,000.
665 SECTION 60. Item 9110-1630 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
666 by inserting the following words:- and provided further, that the secretary of the executive office
667 of aging and independence may transfer funds between items 9110-1630 and 9110-0600.
668 SECTION 61. Item 1595-1068 of section 2E of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, as
669 amended by section 128 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the
670 figure “$837,827,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $972,235,420.
671 SECTION 62. Said item 1595-1068 of said section 2E of said chapter 140, as amended
672 by section 127 of said chapter 248, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure
673 “$444,250,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $539,980,000.
674 SECTION 63. Section 202 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
675 striking out the words “February 1” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- October
676 15.
32 of 40

677 SECTION 64. Section 217 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out the
678 figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
679 SECTION 65. Section 126 of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
680 striking out the words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December
681 31.
682 SECTION 66. Section 127 of said chapter 150 is hereby amended by striking out the
683 words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 31.
684 SECTION 67. Section 128 of said chapter 150 is hereby amended by striking out the
685 words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 31.
686 SECTION 68. Section 150 of chapter 178 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
687 striking out the words “January 1,” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
688 December 31.
689 SECTION 69. Section 152 of chapter 178 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
690 striking out the figure “2024” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2025.
691 SECTION 70. Section 5 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking
692 out the words “June 1” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- November 15.
693 SECTION 71. Section 293 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
694 striking out in the first sentence, each time they appear, the words “and officers”.
695 SECTION 72. Section 304 of said chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
696 striking out the word “agriculture” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- public
697 health.
33 of 40

698 SECTION 73. Said section 304 of said chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
699 amended by striking out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
700 2026.
701 SECTION 74. Section 65 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
702 striking out the words “to fourth paragraphs, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the
703 following paragraph” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- paragraph and
704 inserting in place thereof the following paragraph.
705 SECTION 75. Said chapter 239 is hereby amended by inserting after section 65 the
706 following section:-
707 SECTION 65A. Said section 69J of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
708 by striking out the words “plans for expansion and construction of the applicant's new facilities
709 are consistent with current health, environmental protection, and resource use and development
710 policies as adopted by the commonwealth; and are consistent with the policies stated in section
711 sixty-nine H to provide a necessary energy supply for the commonwealth with a minimum
712 impact on the environment at lowest possible cost;” and inserting in place thereof the following
713 words:- “and are consistent with the policies stated in section 69H”.
714 SECTION 76. Said chapter 239 is hereby amended by inserting after section 68 the
715 following section:-
716 SECTION 68A. The fifth paragraph of said section 69J1/4 of said chapter 164, as so appearing,
717 is hereby further amended by striking out clause (iii).
34 of 40

718 SECTION 77. Paragraph (v) of subsection (b) of section 118 of chapter 239 of the acts of
719 2024 is hereby amended by striking out the words “the generation facility” and inserting in place
720 thereof the following words:- “the energy storage system”.
721 SECTION 78. Subsection (e) of section 118 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
722 amended by striking out the words “the department of public utilities”.
723 SECTION 79. Section 129 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
724 striking out the figure “133” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 132.
725 SECTION 80. Said section 129 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
726 word “March” and inserting place thereof the following word:- May.
727 SECTION 81. Section 130 of said chapter 239 hereby amended by striking out the word
728 “March” and inserting place thereof the following word:- May.
729 SECTION 82. Section 131 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
730 word “March” and inserting place thereof the following word:- May.
731 SECTION 83. Section 132 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
732 words “March” and inserting place thereof the following words:- May.
733 SECTION 84. Section 133 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
734 word “March” and inserting place thereof the following word:- May.
735 SECTION 85. Section 139 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
736 words “64 to 68,” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 60 to 62, inclusive, 64 to
737 69.
35 of 40

738 SECTION 86. Section 140 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
739 word “March” and inserting place thereof the following word:- May.
740 SECTION 87. Item 3000-1142 of section 2A of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
741 amended by striking out the word “between” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
742 from this item to.
743 SECTION 88. Sections 5, 21 and 38 of chapter 342 of the acts of 2024 are hereby
744 repealed.
745 SECTION 89. Sections 14, 38 and 81 of chapter 343 of the acts of 2024 are hereby
746 repealed.
747 SECTION 90. Chapter 390 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out the
748 words “public way within 3 miles of the vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the town of
749 Barnstable and which may pass over the roadways of the town of Yarmouth” and inserting in
750 place thereof the following words:- locally owned or controlled public way within 3 miles of the
751 vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the town of Barnstable and which may pass over the
752 locally owned or controlled roadways of the town of Yarmouth; provided, however, that said
753 vessel shall be trucked by a professional licensed boat hauler. For the purposes of this section,
754 public ways shall not include roadways owned or within the control of the Massachusetts
755 Department of Transportation.
756 SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, sections 80,
757 88, 92 to 95, inclusive, and 97 to 99, inclusive, of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall only
758 apply to land purchased or taken under a tax title on or after November 1, 2024.
36 of 40

759 SECTION 92. Notwithstanding sections 185A to 185E, inclusive, of chapter 140 of the
760 General Laws, as amended by sections 249 and 250 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, no person
761 shall be required to be licensed to engage in the business of selling tickets or the business of
762 reselling or facilitating a mechanism for 2 or more parties to participate in the resale of any ticket
763 of admission under said section 185A of said chapter 140 until January 1, 2026.
764 SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all funds
765 currently in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, Inspector General Expendable Trust shall be
766 transferred by the Comptroller to the Office of the Inspector General Recovery Fund, established
767 under section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29 of the General Laws not later than 90 days from the
768 effective date of this act.
769 SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
770 unexpended balances, not to exceed a total of $40,000,000, in items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426
771 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall not revert to the General Fund until
772 September 1, 2025 and may be expended by the executive office of health and human services to
773 pay for services enumerated in said items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426 provided during fiscal year
774 2025.
775 SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
776 2025, the secretary of health and human services, with the written approval of the secretary of
777 administration and finance, may authorize transfers of surplus among items 4000-0320, 4000-
778 0430, 4000-0500, 4000-0601, 4000-0641, 4000-0700, 4000-0875, 4000-0880, 4000-0885, 4000-
779 0940, 4000-0950, 4000-0990, 4000-1400, 4000-1420 and 4000-1426.
37 of 40

780 SECTION 96. Notwithstanding the terms of any prior appropriation or any other general
781 or special law to the contrary, any unexpended funds appropriated to and held by the
782 Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation shall be transferred to and be expended by the
783 Massachusetts Development Finance Agency to ensure post-merger continuity of the agency’s
784 programs.
785 SECTION 97. The salary adjustments and other economic benefits authorized by the
786 following collective bargaining agreements shall be effective for the purposes of section 7 of
787 chapter 150E of the General Laws:
788 (1) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
789 Employees' Union, Local 103, K-9 Unit, Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
790 2027;
791 (2) the agreement between the Board of Trustees of the University of Massachusetts and Service
792 Employees International Union, Local 888, Unit L95, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
793 30, 2027;
794 (3) the agreement between the Secretary of the Commonwealth and Service Employees
795 International Union, Local 888 AFL/CIO on behalf of certain employees of the Suffolk Registry
796 of Deeds, Unit SC2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
797 (4) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
798 Employees' Union, Local 103 K-9 Unit, Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
799 2027;
38 of 40

800 (5) the agreement between the Sheriff of Plymouth County and the New England Police
801 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 580 (BCI), Unit SP3, effective from July 1, 2024
802 through June 30, 2027;
803 (6) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the National Association of
804 Government Employees, RI Local 202, Unit SN1, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
805 2027;
806 (7) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional Officers
807 Association, NEPBA Local 570, Unit SN3, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
808 (8) the agreement between the Board of Higher Education and the Association of Professional
809 Administrators, MTA/NEA, Unit APA, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
810 (9) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional Officers
811 Association, NEPBA Local 575, Unit SN2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
812 (10) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire Sheriff's Office
813 Treatment Association (SOTA), Unit SH6, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
814 (11) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire Jail and House
815 of Correction Supervisory Correctional Officers, Unit SH8, effective from July 1, 2024 through
816 June 30, 2027;
817 (12) the agreement between the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the New England Police
818 Benevolent Association, Unit 4A, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027; and
819 (13) the agreement between the Sheriff of Barnstable County and NAGE-IBCO, Local 217, Unit
820 S3B, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027.
39 of 40

821 SECTION 98. Sections 4 and 7 of this act shall take effect for the budgets for the health
822 policy commission and the center for health information and analysis, respectively, beginning in
823 fiscal year 2027; provided, however, that for fiscal year 2027, the first preliminary payments for
824 the pharmaceutical manufacturer assessment and the pharmacy benefits manager assessment
825 shall be due to the health policy commission and the center for health information and analysis,
826 respectively, on October 1, 2026, in an amount equal to 1/2 of the initial year’s total assessment.
40 of 40